Mississippi, session 2026, HB183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The school board of a school district with a "D" or "F" accountability rating, in collaboration with the local community or junior college, is authorized to establish a Summer Youth Training Employment Program for the purpose of providing high school students with skills in pursuing employment opportunities and guidance in the selection of academic courses consistent with the long range educational and career goals of each student.  A program established under this section must be comprised of no less than the following three (3) components:  soft skills; personal living skills; and education and academics in preparation for vocational training or college after high school graduation. (2)  Students who have completed the ninth grade are eligible to participate in a Summer Youth Training Employment Program established under this section during the summer before entering the tenth grade.  Sessions of the program may be held at a high school or high schools in the district or on the campus of the local community or junior college. (3)  The component in soft skills of a Summer Youth Training Employment Program established under this section must be designed to prepare students to be successful in whatever job they ultimately may hold as well as in the classroom.  The soft skills component must include training and instruction in no less than the following topics: (a)  Time management, including punctuality and attendance at work; (b)  Teamwork; (c)  Positive attitudes; (d)  Creative thinking; (e)  Conflict resolution; (f)  Motivation; (g)  Interpersonal skills such as communication, listening and empathy; and (h)  Respect of authority and coworkers. (4)  The personal living skills component of a program established under this section must include training and instruction in no less than the following topics: (a)  Beginning a job search; (b)  Completing a neat and well-written job application, using proper spelling and grammar; (c)  Dressing appropriately when delivering a hand written application or going to an interview; (d)  Demonstrating interest in a prospective job and communicating respectfully with a prospective employer; (e)  Appropriate use of personal cell phones in the workplace and in school; and (f)  Personal financial responsibility, including: (i)  How to open and maintain a personal checking account; (ii)  How to open a savings account and dedicate a portion of earnings to savings; (iii)  The importance of resisting unsolicited offers for credit as a high school student; and (iv)  The importance of paying financial obligations in order to establish good credit. (5)  The component on education and academics in preparation for vocational training or college after high school graduation must include no less than the following: (a)  An assessment of each participating student which identifies the student's interests, strengths and aptitudes and possible career fields that suit the student; (b)  Exposure to career fields in which there is a foreseeable need for workers and the high school and community or junior college courses and baccalaureate degree programs that will equip a student for an occupation in one (1) of those fields; (c)  Direct exposure through observation on the community or junior college campus of technical courses available to prepare students for a trade after high school; (d)  Information on postsecondary academic courses that will earn a student credit towards the general requirements of a baccalaureate degree which are available at the local community or junior college and which may be taken while the student is still in high school or after graduation; (e)  The importance of doing one's best in high school and college and availing oneself of tutoring and counseling when needed; and (f)  Identifying sources of and procuring financial assistance available to students pursuing postsecondary career and vocational training or a bachelor's degree. (6)  The State Legislature shall appropriate Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) for the operation of this program. (7)  Students who complete a Summer Youth Training Employment Program established under this section will be awarded a certificate of completion evidencing their successful participation in the program. (8)  A school district that establishes a Summer Youth Training Employment Program shall encourage ninth grade students to enroll in the program.  The district may offer a stipend to students who complete the program as a financial incentive.  A school district is encouraged to apply for funding from any available source, public or private, to cover the costs associated with the expansion of the training instruction in the program and providing stipends to students.  Grants or gifts may be accepted by a school district for the purposes of this subsection (8). SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.